Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Licensing and Regulation of Mechancial Administrators.

Sec. 08.40.210.
Purpose of AS 08.40.210 — 08.40.490.

The purpose of AS

08.40.210

—

08.40.490

is to protect the safety of people and property in the state from the danger of improperly installed or modified mechanical systems by providing a procedure to assure

the public that persons responsible for making mechanical installations in this state are qualified; and

that a sufficient number of persons are so qualified.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988)

Sec. 08.40.220.
Board of mechanical examiners. [Repealed, § 37 ch 101 SLA 1994.]

Sec. 08.40.230.
Categories of licenses.

The department may adopt regulations establishing categories of mechanical administrators, qualifications for those categories, and the content of examinations for applicants for each category.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988; am § 19 ch 101 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For application and examination requirements, see 12 AAC 39, art. 1.

For mechanical administrator license categories, qualifications, and scope, see 12 AAC 39, art. 2.

Sec. 08.40.240.
Regulations.

The department shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) relating to the examination and licensing of mechanical administrators and the establishing of the continued competency of licensees for license renewal and reinstatement.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988; am § 20 ch 101 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1998, “and” was inserted in place of a comma after “administrators” to correct a manifest error in sec. 20, ch 101, SLA 1994.

Administrative Code. —

For application and examination requirements, see 12 AAC 39, art. 1.

For mechanical administrator license categories, qualifications, and scope, see 12 AAC 39, art. 2.

For continuing education, see 12 AAC 39, art. 3.

Sec. 08.40.250.
Examinations.

The department shall conduct licensing examinations at least twice each year at appropriate places in the state.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988; am § 21 ch 101 SLA 1994)

Sec. 08.40.260.
License required.

A person may not act as a mechanical administrator without a license unless the person is covered by an exclusion under AS

08.40.390

.

A person licensed under AS

08.40.210

—

08.40.490

may perform work only in a category for which the person is licensed.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988; am § 22 ch 101 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For application and examination requirements, see 12 AAC 39, art. 1.

For mechanical administrator license categories, qualifications, and scope, see 12 AAC 39, art. 2.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The implied exemption recognized in the 1979 informal opinion (1979 Inf. Op. Att’y Gen. (June 27)) continues, and employees of the state are exempt from the requirements of
AS

08.40.260

regarding mechanical administrators. Further, an entity such as a village council in an established community performing work described in
AS

08.40.390

would be exempt from mechanical administrator requirements, but a school district would not be. November 12, 2002 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 08.40.270.
Examination of applicant.

Each applicant shall be examined to determine the applicant’s

ability to understand plans, design specifications, and engineering terms commonly used in the mechanical field;

knowledge of mechanical installations and piping;

familiarity with the requirements of the Uniform Plumbing Code, Uniform Swimming Pool, Spa, and Hot Tub Code, Uniform Solar Energy Code, and the Uniform Mechanical Code currently in effect in the state;

personal skill and ability.

If an applicant for a license submits proof satisfactory to the department that the applicant is licensed as a mechanical administrator or the equivalent by another state or territory, meets qualifications established by the department under AS

08.40.230

, and has passed an examination equivalent to the test administered under (a) of this section, the department shall waive all of the examination required under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988; am §§ 23, 37 ch 101 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For application and examination requirements, see 12 AAC 39, art. 1.

For mechanical administrator license categories, qualifications, and scope, see 12 AAC 39, art. 2.

Sec. 08.40.280.
Administrator limited to one licensed contractor.

A person may not qualify or operate as a mechanical administrator for more than one registered contractor, corporation, joint venture, or other business entity unless the municipality or community where the person qualifies or operates as a mechanical administrator is the principal place of business of fewer than three mechanical administrators.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988)

Sec. 08.40.290.
Renewal and reinstatement.

A license issued under AS

08.40.210

—

08.40.490

is nontransferable and, unless revoked or suspended, may be renewed on a date set by the department upon proof of continued competency.

A lapsed license may be reinstated upon proof of continued competency and by payment of all unpaid renewal fees and any penalty fee established under AS

08.01.100(b)

unless the license has been lapsed for more than two years. If a person’s license has been lapsed for more than two years, the person is required to take an examination under AS

08.40.270

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988; am § 24 ch 101 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For application and examination requirements, see 12 AAC 39, art. 1.

For continuing education, see 12 AAC 39, art. 3.

Sec. 08.40.300.
Issuance and possession of license.

An applicant who successfully passes the examination shall receive a license. The licensee shall have the license in immediate possession at all times when performing activities for which the license is required and shall present the license for inspection upon the demand of an authorized representative of the department identified as such to the licensee by the representative.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988; am § 25 ch 101 SLA 1994)

Sec. 08.40.310.
Fees.

Each applicant and each licensee shall pay application and renewal fees established under AS

08.01.065

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For application and examination requirements, see 12 AAC 39, art. 1.

Sec. 08.40.320.
Disciplinary actions.

The department may take the disciplinary actions set out in (d) of this section upon a finding that

the license application is fraudulent or misleading;

the licensee has knowingly violated AS

08.40.210

—

08.40.490

, a code listed in AS

08.40.490

(3)(A), or an order or regulation of the department; or

the licensee is incompetent or has engaged in fraudulent practices.

Notice of a proposed disciplinary action under this section must be in writing and must state the grounds.

Proceedings for a disciplinary action under this section shall be governed by AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

The department may take the following disciplinary actions under (a) of this section, singly or in combination:

refuse to issue a license;

permanently revoke a license;

suspend a license for a specified period;

censure or reprimand a licensee;

impose limitations or conditions on the professional practice of a licensee;

require a licensee to submit to peer review;

impose requirements for remedial professional education to correct deficiencies in the education, training, and skill of the licensee;

impose probation requiring a licensee to report regularly to the department on matters related to the grounds for probation.

The department may withdraw probationary status if the deficiencies that required the sanction are remedied.

The department may summarily suspend a license before a final hearing is held or during an appeal if the department finds that the licensee poses a clear and immediate danger to the public health and safety. A person is entitled to a hearing conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) to appeal the summary suspension within seven days after the order of suspension is issued. A person may appeal an adverse decision of the department on an appeal of a summary suspension to a court of competent jurisdiction.

The department may reinstate a suspended or revoked license if, after a hearing, the department finds that the licensee is able to practice the profession with skill and safety.

The department may accept the voluntary surrender of a license. A license may not be returned to the person who surrendered the license unless the department determines that the person is competent to resume practice and the person pays the appropriate renewal fee.

The department shall seek consistency in the application of disciplinary sanctions. The department shall explain a significant departure from prior decisions involving similar facts in the order imposing the sanction.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988; am §§ 26, 27 ch 101 SLA 1994; am § 13 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For continuing education, see 12 AAC 39, art. 3.

Sec. 08.40.330.
Investigations.

The department may investigate alleged or apparent violations of AS

08.40.210

—

08.40.490

. The department, upon showing proper credentials, may enter, during regular hours of work, a construction site where it appears that mechanical work is being done. The department may make inquiries about the identity of the mechanical administrator or the person acting in the capacity of a mechanical administrator. Upon demand, a mechanical administrator or person acting in the capacity of a mechanical administrator, or that person’s representative, shall produce evidence of current licensure.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988; am § 28 ch 101 SLA 1994)

Cross references. —

For investigative and enforcement powers of the department, see AS

08.01.087

.

Sec. 08.40.340.
Issuance of citations.

The department may issue a citation that complies with AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

for a violation if there is probable cause to believe a person has violated AS

08.40.210

—

08.40.490

. Each day a violation continues after a citation for the violation has been issued constitutes a separate violation.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988; am § 29 ch 101 SLA 1994; am § 17 ch 29 SLA 2010)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendment of this section applies “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 08.40.350.
Procedure and form of citation.

A person receiving the citation under AS

08.40.340

is not required to sign a notice to appear in court.

The time specified in the notice to appear on a citation issued under AS

08.40.340

must be at least five working days after the issuance of the citation.

The department is responsible for the issuance of books containing appropriate citations and shall maintain a record of each book issued and each citation contained in it. The department shall require and retain a receipt for every book issued to an employee of the department.

The department shall deposit the original or a copy of the citation with a court having jurisdiction over the alleged offense. Upon its deposit with the court, the citation may be disposed of only by trial in the court or other official action taken by the magistrate, judge, or prosecutor. The department may not dispose of it or copies of it or of the record of its issuance except as required under this subsection and (e) of this section.

The department shall require the return of a copy of every citation issued under AS

08.40.340

and of all copies of every citation that has been spoiled or upon which an entry has been made and not issued to an alleged violator. The department shall also maintain, in connection with every citation issued by the department, a record of the disposition of the charge by the court where the original or copy of the citation was deposited.

A citation issued under AS

08.40.340

is considered to be a lawful complaint for the purpose of prosecution.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988; am §§ 30 — 32 ch 101 SLA 1994; am §§ 18 — 20 ch 29 SLA 2010)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendments to (a), (b), and (f) of this section apply “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 08.40.360.
Cease and desist order.

If the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development determines that a person is acting as a mechanical administrator in violation of AS

08.40.210

—

08.40.490

, the commissioner may issue a cease and desist order prohibiting further action by the person as a mechanical administrator. The cease and desist order remains in effect until the person has submitted evidence acceptable to the commissioner showing that the violation has been corrected.

A person affected by an order issued under (a) of this section may seek equitable relief preventing the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development from enforcing the order.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in subsections (a) and (b) in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in subsections (a) and (b), “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 08.40.370.
Injunctive relief.

The commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development may seek an injunction in the superior court to enjoin a person from violating AS

08.40.210

—

08.40.490

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 08.40.380.
Penalties.

A person who knowingly violates AS

08.40.210

—

08.40.490

, or who knowingly violates a regulation or order of the department or a code listed in AS

08.40.490

(3)(A) that was in effect at the time that the installation or repair was made, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $5,000.

Unless the citation has been voided or otherwise dismissed by the magistrate, judge, or prosecutor, a person who without lawful justification or excuse fails to appear in court to answer a citation issued under AS

08.40.340

, regardless of the disposition of the charge for which the citation was issued, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988; am § 33 ch 101 SLA 1994)

Sec. 08.40.390.
Exclusions.

AS

08.40.210

—

08.40.490

do not apply to a utility, municipality, or local governing body whose employees are engaged in mechanical work on an integral part of a system owned and operated by the utility, municipality, or local governing body.

AS

08.40.210

—

08.40.490

do not apply to a person engaged in

the manufacture or repair of mechanical apparatus or equipment;

mechanical work, the cost of which does not exceed $50,000, involving residences or small commercial establishments in communities that

have a population of under 5,000 according to the latest available federal or state census or other census approved by the department; or

are over 50 miles by air or water transportation from the business place of a mechanical administrator licensed under AS

08.40.210

—

08.40.490

;

mechanical installation on a single-family residence or a two-family residence that is not intended for sale at the time of making the installation;

installation of water lines or sanitary, storm, or drain sewer lines more than five feet from a building;

mechanical maintenance or repair work if the work is performed by the person as an employee of an owner or tenant of commercial property as part of the employee’s work duties with respect to the property but is not offered or performed as a service to the public;

design, installation, maintenance, or repair of fire extinguishing systems.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988; am § 34 ch 101 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (b)(2) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was substituted for “Department of Community and Regional Affairs” in accordance with § 91(a)(1), ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (b)(2) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 08.40.400.
Personal supervision.

A person licensed under AS

08.40.210

—

08.40.490

as a mechanical administrator who is responsible for installation or modification of mechanical piping and systems, devices, fixtures, equipment, or other mechanical materials, or who is responsible for certifying that the installation or modification complies with applicable codes, shall personally inspect those materials after installation and modification unless the installation or modification amounts to simple or highly standardized work performed in less than 24 man-hours by personnel generally under the supervision of the mechanical administrator.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988; am § 35 ch 101 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For mechanical administrator license categories, qualifications, and scope, see 12 AAC 39, art. 2.

Sec. 08.40.490.
Definitions.

In AS

08.40.210

—

08.40.490

,

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development except where the context otherwise requires;

“manufacture” means fabrication or completion of a product or mechanical apparatus exclusive of its completion or installation at a job site;

“mechanical administrator” means a person who is responsible for

installing or modifying mechanical piping and systems, devices, fixtures, equipment, or other mechanical materials subject to the Uniform Plumbing Code, Uniform Swimming Pool, Spa, and Hot Tub Code, Uniform Solar Energy Code, and the Uniform Mechanical Code as published by the International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials and the International Conference of Building Officials; or

certifying that an installation or modification described in (A) of this paragraph complies with the applicable codes;

“mechanical piping” includes piping fixtures, devices, and equipment;

“utility” means every public, cooperative, or other corporation, company, individual, or association of individuals, their lessees, trustees, or receivers appointed by a court, that owns, operates, manages, or controls a plant or system for

furnishing, by generation, transmission, or distribution, electrical service, fuel gas service, district heating, sewage disposal, or domestic water service to the public for compensation;

furnishing telecommunications service to the public for compensation.

History.

(§ 9 ch 132 SLA 1988; am § 36 ch 101 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.